Utah statutes.
58-67-302.5.   Licensing of graduates of foreign medical schools.

(1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an individual enrolled in a medical school outside the United States, its territories, the District of Columbia, or Canada is eligible for licensure as a physician and surgeon in this state if the individual has satisfied the following requirements:

(a)  meets all the requirements of Subsection 58-67-302(1), except for Subsection 58-67-302(1)(d);

(b)  has studied medicine in a medical school located outside the United States which is recognized by an organization approved by the division;

(c)  has completed all of the formal requirements of the foreign medical school except internship or social service;

(d)  has attained a passing score on the educational commission for foreign medical graduates examination or other qualifying examinations such as the United States Medical Licensing Exam parts I and II, which are approved by the division or a medical school approved by the division;

(e)  has satisfactorily completed one calendar year of supervised clinical training under the direction of a United States medical education setting accredited by the liaison committee for graduate medical education and approved by the division;

(f)  has completed the postgraduate hospital training required by Subsection 58-67-302(1)(e)(i); and

(g)  has passed the examination required by the division of all applicants for licensure.

(2)  Satisfaction of the requirements of Subsection (1) is in lieu of:

(a)  the completion of any foreign internship or social service requirements; and

(b)  the certification required by Subsection 58-67-302(1)(d).

(3)  Individuals who satisfy the requirements of Subsections (1)(a) through (f) shall be eligible for admission to graduate medical education programs within the state, including internships and residencies, which are accredited by the liaison committee for graduate medical education.

(4)  A document issued by a medical school located outside the United States shall be considered the equivalent of a degree of doctor of medicine for the purpose of licensure as a physician and surgeon in this state if:

(a)  the foreign medical school is recognized by an organization approved by the division;

(b)  the document granted by the foreign medical school is issued after the completion of all formal requirements of the medical school except internship or social service; and

(c)  the foreign medical school certifies that the person to whom the document was issued has satisfactorily completed the requirements of Subsection (1)(c).

(5)  The provisions for licensure under this section shall be known as the "fifth pathway program."



Amended by Chapter 214, 2011 General Session

